Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2222
Nursing; license; examination.

An applicant for a license as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse shall pass an examination as prescribed by the board in rules and regulations.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 8(1), p. 841;

Laws 1975, LB 422, § 9;

Laws 1980, LB 847, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 472, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 23;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 57;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.14;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 778.